src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_MUARJU !!≈ @CODE@ muarju:muarja
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Back
!! two forms for accusative
!! two forms for elative, ablative phrases
!!€gt-norm:   Noun 'berry / marja' - full paradigm: Noun - muarju
!!€  muarju: muarju+N+Sg+Nom
!!€  muarjan: muarju+N+Sg+Gen
!  muarju: muarju+N+Sg+Acc
!  muarjan: muarju+N+Sg+Acc
!!€  muarjua: muarju+N+Sg+Par
!!€  muarjakse: muarju+N+Sg+Tra
!!€  muarjata: muarju+N+Sg+Abe
!!€  muarjanke: muarju+N+Sg+Com
!!€  muarjas: muarju+N+Sg+Ine
!!€  muarjaspäi: muarju+N+Sg+Ela
!  muarjas: muarju+N+Sg+Ela
!!€  muarjah: muarju+N+Sg+Ill
!!€  muarjal: muarju+N+Sg+Ade
!!€  muarjalpäi: muarju+N+Sg+Abl
!  muarjal: muarju+N+Sg+Abl
!!€  muarjale: muarju+N+Sg+All
!!€  muarjannu: muarju+N+Sg+Ess
!!€  muarjassah: muarju+N+Sg+Ter
!!€  muarjalluo: muarju+N+Sg+Apr
!!€  muarjat: muarju+N+Pl+Nom
!!€  muarjoin: muarju+N+Pl+Gen
!  muarjat: muarju+N+Pl+Acc
!!€  muarjoi: muarju+N+Pl+Par
!!€  muarjoikse: muarju+N+Pl+Tra
!!€  muarjoita: muarju+N+Pl+Abe
!!€  muarjoinke: muarju+N+Pl+Com
!!€  muarjois: muarju+N+Pl+Ine
!!€  muarjoispäi: muarju+N+Pl+Ela
!  muarjois: muarju+N+Pl+Ela
!!€  muarjoih: muarju+N+Pl+Ill
!!€  muarjoil: muarju+N+Pl+Ade
!!€  muarjoilpäi: muarju+N+Pl+Abl
! muarjoil: muarju+N+Pl+Abl
!!€  muarjoile: muarju+N+Pl+All
!!€  muarjoinnu: muarju+N+Pl+Ess
!!€  muarjoin: muarju+N+Pl+Ins
!!€  muarjoilluo: muarju+N+Pl+Apr
!:%^A2UÄ2Y ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_MUARJU-SG ;
 N_MUARJU-PL ;

LEXICON N_MUARJU-SG
:%{back%} NMN_MUARJU/PIÄSTÄNDY-SG ;
LEXICON N_MUARJU-PL
:%{back%} NMN_MUARJU/PIÄSTÄNDY-PL ;

LEXICON N_PIÄSTÄNDY !!≈ @CODE@ piäständy:piäständä
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Front
!:%^A2UÄ2Y ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_PIÄSTÄNDY-SG ;
 N_PIÄSTÄNDY-PL ;

LEXICON N_PIÄSTÄNDY-SG
:%{front%} NMN_MUARJU/PIÄSTÄNDY-SG ;
LEXICON N_PIÄSTÄNDY-PL
:%{front%} NMN_MUARJU/PIÄSTÄNDY-PL ;


LEXICON N_SUAJU !!≈ @CODE@ suaju:suaja
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Back
!:%^A2UÄ2Y ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_SUAJU-SG ;
 N_SUAJU-PL ;

LEXICON N_SUAJU-SG
:%{back%} NMN_SUAJU/XX-SG ;
LEXICON N_SUAJU-PL
:%{back%} NMN_SUAJU/XX-PL ;

LEXICON N_AKKU_errorth !!≈ @CODE@ akku:akka
+Err/Orth: N_AKKU ;
LEXICON N_AKKU !!≈ @CODE@ akku:akka
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Back
!:%^A2UÄ2Y ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_AKKU-SG ;
 N_AKKU-PL ;

LEXICON N_AKKU-SG
:%{back%} NMN_AKKU-SG ;
LEXICON N_AKKU-PL
:%{back%} NMN_AKKU-PL ;

LEXICON N_KNIIGU !!≈ @CODE@ kniigu:kniiga
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Back
!:%{back%}%^A2U ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_KNIIGU-SG ;
 N_KNIIGU-PL ;

LEXICON N_KNIIGU-SG
:%{back%} NMN_KNIIGU-SG ;
LEXICON N_KNIIGU-PL
:%{back%} NMN_KNIIGU-PL ;

LEXICON N_SULGU !!≈ @CODE@ sulgu:sulga
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Back
!:%^A2U ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_SULGU-SG ;
 N_SULGU-PL ;

LEXICON N_SULGU-SG
:%{back%} NMN_SULGU-SG ;

LEXICON N_SULGU-PL
:%{back%} NMN_SULGU-PL ;

LEXICON N_MÄRGY !!≈ @CODE@ märgy:märgä
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: front
!! IF possible change to SULGU/MÄRGY
!:%^A2U ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_MÄRGY-SG ;
 N_MÄRGY-PL ;

LEXICON N_MÄRGY-SG
:%{front%} NMN_MÄRGY-SG ;

LEXICON N_MÄRGY-PL
:%{front%} NMN_MÄRGY-PL ;



LEXICON N_KOIRU !!≈ @CODE@ koiru:koira
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!:%^A2U ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_KOIRU-SG ;
 N_KOIRU-PL ;

LEXICON N_KOIRU-SG
:%{back%} NMN_KOIRU/PÄIVY-SG ;

LEXICON N_KOIRU-PL
:%{back%} NMN_KOIRU/PÄIVY-PL ;

LEXICON N_NIMI !!≈ @CODE@ nimi:nim
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Front
!:i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
	N_NIMI-SG  ;
	N_NIMI-PL  ;

LEXICON N_NIMI-SG
:%{front%} NMN_HANGI/NIMI-SG ;

LEXICON N_NIMI-PL
:%{front%} NMN_HANGI/NIMI-PL ;

LEXICON N_HANGI !!≈ @CODE@ hangi:hang
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!:i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
	N_HANGI-SG  ;
	N_HANGI-PL  ;

LEXICON N_HANGI-SG
:%{back%} NMN_HANGI/NIMI-SG ;

LEXICON N_HANGI-PL
:%{back%} NMN_HANGI/NIMI-PL ;

LEXICON N_YLE
	N_YLE-SG ;

LEXICON N_YLE-SG
:%{front%} NMN_YLE-SG ;

LEXICON N_PÄIVY !!≈ @CODE@ päivy:päivä
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Front
!:%^A2U ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
	N_PÄIVY-SG ;
	N_PÄIVY-PL ;

LEXICON N_PÄIVY-SG
:%{front%} NMN_KOIRU/PÄIVY-SG	;

LEXICON N_PÄIVY-PL
:%{front%} NMN_KOIRU/PÄIVY-PL	;

LEXICON N_MEČČY !!≈ @CODE@ meččy:meččä
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Front
!:%^A2U ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
 N_MEČČY-SG ;
 N_MEČČY-PL ;

LEXICON N_MEČČY-SG
:%{front%} NMN_MEČČY-SG ;
LEXICON N_MEČČY-PL
:%{front%} NMN_MEČČY-PL ;


LEXICON N_IŽÄNDY !!≈ @CODE@ ižändy:ižändä
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Front
!:%^A2U ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
	N_IŽÄNDY-SG ;
	N_IŽÄNDY-PL ;

LEXICON N_IŽÄNDY-SG
:%{front%} NMN_IŽÄNDY-SG	;

LEXICON N_IŽÄNDY-PL
:%{front%} NMN_IŽÄNDY-PL	;

LEXICON N_LATE !!≈ @CODE@ late:latte
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Back
!!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; Work needed
	N_LATE-SG	;
	N_LATE-PL	;
LEXICON N_LATE-SG
:%{back%}	NMN_LATE/SIVE-SG	;

LEXICON N_LATE-PL
:%{back%}	NMN_LATE/SIVE-PL	;

LEXICON N_SIVE !!≈ @CODE@ sive:side
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Front
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ; Work needed
	N_SIVE-SG	;
	N_SIVE-PL	;
LEXICON N_SIVE-SG
:%{front%}	NMN_LATE/SIVE-SG	;

LEXICON N_SIVE-PL
:%{front%}	NMN_LATE/SIVE-PL	;

!LEXICON N_HARDIE_SUB
!+Err/Orth: N_HARDIE ;
LEXICON N_HARDIE !!≈ @CODE@ hardie:hardie
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_HARDIE-SG ;
        N_HARDIE-PL ;

LEXICON N_HARDIE-SG
:%{back%} NMN_HARDIE-SG        ;

LEXICON N_HARDIE-PL
:%{back%} NMN_HARDIE-PL        ;

LEXICON N_KONDII !!≈ @CODE@ kondii:kondi
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!:i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_KONDII-SG ;
        N_KONDII-PL ;

LEXICON N_KONDII-SG
:%{back%} NMN_KONDII/STIPENDII-SG        ;

LEXICON N_KONDII-PL
:%{back%} NMN_KONDII/STIPENDII-PL        ;

LEXICON N_STIPENDII !!≈ @CODE@ stipendii:stipendi
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!:i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_STIPENDII-SG ;
        N_STIPENDII-PL ;

LEXICON N_STIPENDII-SG
:%{front%} NMN_KONDII/STIPENDII-SG        ;

LEXICON N_STIPENDII-PL
:%{front%} NMN_KONDII/STIPENDII-PL        ;

LEXICON N_REBOI !!≈ @CODE@ reboi:reboi
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Back
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_REBOI-SG ;
        N_REBOI-PL ;
LEXICON N_REBOI-SG
:%{back%} NMN_REBOI/JÄNÖI-SG ;
LEXICON N_REBOI-PL
:%{back%} NMN_REBOI/JÄNÖI-PL ;

LEXICON N_JÄNÖI !!≈ @CODE@ jänöi:jänöi
!! Gradation No
!! Harmony: Back
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_JÄNÖI-SG ;
        N_JÄNÖI-PL ;
LEXICON N_JÄNÖI-SG
:%{front%} NMN_REBOI/JÄNÖI-SG ;
LEXICON N_JÄNÖI-PL
:%{front%} NMN_REBOI/JÄNÖI-PL ;

LEXICON N_PÖČÖI !!≈ @CODE@ pöčöi:pöččö
!! Gradation Yes
!! Harmony: Front
!:%^WGStemi ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_PÖČÖI-SG ;
        N_PÖČÖI-PL ;
LEXICON N_PÖČÖI-SG
:%{front%} NMN_PÖČÖI-SG ;
LEXICON N_PÖČÖI-PL
:%{front%} NMN_PÖČÖI-PL ;

LEXICON N_VALGEI !!≈ @CODE@ valgei:valge
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!:i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_VALGEI-SG ;
        N_VALGEI-PL ;

LEXICON N_VALGEI-SG
:%{back%} NMN_VALGEI/LIBEI-SG        ;

LEXICON N_VALGEI-PL
:%{back%} NMN_VALGEI/LIBEI-PL        ;

LEXICON N_LIBEI !!≈ @CODE@ libei:libe
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!:i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_LIBEI-SG ;
        N_LIBEI-PL ;

LEXICON N_LIBEI-SG
:%{front%} NMN_VALGEI/LIBEI-SG        ;

LEXICON N_LIBEI-PL
:%{front%} NMN_VALGEI/LIBEI-PL        ;

LEXICON N_OSTAI !!≈ @CODE@ ostai:osta
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!:i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_OSTAI-SG ;
        N_OSTAI-PL ;

LEXICON N_OSTAI-SG
:%>%{ijPRC%} NMN_OSTAI-SG        ;

LEXICON N_OSTAI-PL
:%>%{ijPRC%} NMN_OSTAI-PL        ;

LEXICON N_PEZII !!≈ @CODE@ pezii:pezi
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Front
!:i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_PEZII-SG ;
        N_PEZII-PL ;

LEXICON N_PEZII-SG
:%>%{ijPRC%} NMN_PEZII-SG        ;

LEXICON N_PEZII-PL
:%>%{ijPRC%} NMN_PEZII-PL        ;


LEXICON N_KESTÄY !!≈ @CODE@ kestäy:kestä
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Front
!:y ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
        N_KESTÄY-SG ;
        N_KESTÄY-PL ;

LEXICON N_KESTÄY-SG
:%> NMN_KESTÄY-SG        ;

LEXICON N_KESTÄY-PL
:%> NMN_KESTÄY-PL        ;

!! ### TWO-SYLLABLE VOWEL-FINAL STEMS WITH CONSONANT-FINAL PARTITIVE STEM
LEXICON N_UKSI !!≈ @CODE@ uksi:uks
!! Gradation NA
!! Harmony: Back
!:i ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;
	N_UKSI-SG ;
	N_UKSI-PL ;
