src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
argipäivät+N:argi#päivä N_PÄIVY-PL  "arkipäivät" ;
astiet+N:astie N_HARDIE-PL  "astiat" ;
brilliantu+N:brillianta N_MUARJU  "briljantti" ;
demokruattii+N:demokruatti N_KONDII  "demokratia" ;
duačču+N:duačča N_AKKU  "kesämökki" ;
ennitändy+N:ennitändä N_PIÄSTÄNDY  "ohitus" ;
havizendu+N:havizenda N_MUARJU  "kehunta" ;
histourii+N:histouri N_KONDII-SG  "historia" ;
huondesvalgei+N:huondes#valge N_VALGEI  "aamunkoitto" ;
hyigie+N:hyigie N_HARDIE  "häpeä" ;
hyybii+N:hyybi N_STIPENDII  "pöllö" ;
hätkestyndy+N:hätkestyndä N_PIÄSTÄNDY  "viivytys" ;
hölmöi+N:hölmöi N_JÄNÖI  "hölmö" ;
ilgeittäy+N:ilgeittä N_KESTÄY  "iljettävä" ;
ilmumiäččy+N:ilmu#miäččy N_MEČČY  "ilmapallo" ;
ilonpidäi+N:ilon#pidä N_PEZII  "ilonpitäjä" ;
infektsii+N:infektsi N_KONDII  "tartunta" ;
innostundu+N:innostunda N_KOIRU  "innostus" ;
ižändy+N:ižändä N_IŽÄNDY  "isäntä" ;
jalguniekku+N:jalguniekka N_AKKU  "jalankulkija" ;
jättiet+N:jätte N_SIVE-PL  "jätteet" ;
kangi+N:kang N_HANGI  "(puinen) kanki" ;
kaste+N:kaste N_LATE  "kaste" ;
kellojallat+N:kello#jalga N_AKKU-PL  "kellotorni" ;
kengy+N:kengä N_PÄIVY  "kenkä" ;
keuhkoit+N:keuhkoit N_REBOI-PL  "keuhkot" ;
kezoinkylvendy+N:kezoin#kylvendä N_PIÄSTÄNDY  "uinti" ;
kivi+N:kiv N_NIMI  "kivi" ;
kodijänöi+N:kodi#jänöi N_JÄNÖI  "kaniini" ;
kondienpoigu+N:kondienpoiga N_SULGU  "karhunpoika" ;
kuatančat+N:kuatanča N_MUARJU-PL  "huovikkaat" ;
kädöy+N:kädö N_KESTÄY  "kätevä" ;
köyhät+N:köyhät N_PÄIVY-PL  "köyhät" ;
landiet+N:lande N_LATE-PL  "lanteet" ;
lanne+N:lanne N_LATE  "lanne" ;
lapsensuaju+N:lapsen#suaja N_SUAJU  "synnyttäjä" ;
lavvat+N:lauda N_AKKU-PL  "lauteet" ;
liče+N:ličče N_SIVE  "paino jnk päällä" ;
lodmu+N:lodma N_KOIRU  "notko" ;
luomi+N:luom N_HANGI  "silmäluomi" ;
länget+N:läng N_NIMI-PL  "länget" ;
majataloi+N:maja#taloi N_REBOI  "majatalo" ;
materjualu+N:materjuala N_MUARJU  "materiaali" ;
matkalovit+N:matkalov N_NIMI-PL  "huussi sarajalla, tav. matkalavvat" ;
meččy+N:meččä N_MEČČY  "metsä" ;
modžei+N:modže N_VALGEI  "mäkärä" ;
muutoksenečindy+N:muutoksenečindä N_PÄIVY  "muutoksenhaku" ;
märgy+N:märgä N_MÄRGY  "märkä" ;
niistii+N:niisti N_STIPENDII  "vammainen" ;
nimipäivät+N:nimi#päivä N_KOIRU-PL  "nimipäivät" ;
ongi+N:ong N_HANGI  "onki" ;
opastundu+N:opastunda N_KNIIGU  "opiskelu" ;
pajokniigu+N:paju#kniiga N_KNIIGU  "laulukirja" ;
palgiet+N:palge N_LATE-PL  "palkeet" ;
penziipäivät+N:penzii#päivä N_PÄIVY-PL  "eläkepäivät" ;
perehižändy+N:pereh#ižändä N_IŽÄNDY  "perheenisä" ;
perii+N:peri N_PEZII  "seuraaja" ;
perinät+N+Err/Sub:pernä N_MUARJU-PL  "höyhenpatja" ;
pilvi+N:pilv N_NIMI  "pilvi" ;
pimei+N:pime N_LIBEI  "pimeä" ;
piärme+N:piärme N_SIVE  "päärme" ;
poudu+N:pouda N_SULGU  "pouta" ;
prisʼatku+N:prisʼatka N_MUARJU-SG  "kyykkytanssi" ;
pöčöi+N:pöččö N_PÖČÖI  "pötsi" ;
randie+N:randie N_HARDIE  "reuna" ;
raunivot+N:raunivo N_REBOI-PL  "rauniot" ;
reduryyrei+N:redu#ryyre N_LIBEI  "sottapytty" ;
riet+N:reg N_NIMI-PL  "reet" ;
runonpajattai+N:runon#pajatta N_OSTAI  "runonlaulaja" ;
ruutat+N:ruuta N_KOIRU-PL  "vaatteet" ;
sedakku+N:sedakka N_AKKU  "kyytiläinen" ;
siitsu+N:siitsa N_MUARJU-SG  "siitsi" ;
silmy+N:silmä N_PÄIVY  "silmä" ;
stuulu+N:stuula N_KOIRU  "tuoli" ;
suaju+N:suaja N_SUAJU  "hankkija" ;
suksi+N:suks N_UKSI  "suksi" ;
suomi+N:suom N_NIMI-SG  "suomen" ;
takardandu+N:takardanda N_MUARJU-SG  "sorvaaminen" ;
tedri+N:tedri N_NIMI  "teeri" ;
toimindu+N:toiminda N_KNIIGU  "toiminta" ;
troppu+N:troppa N_SULGU  "polku" ;
uksi+N:uks N_UKSI  "ovi (uksi: uksen: ustu: uksii)" ;
uuličču+N:uličča N_AKKU_errorth  "katu, taivutettuna usein: ulkona, ulos jne, tav. uuličču" ;
vanhembat+N:vanhemba N_KOIRU-PL  "vanhemmat" ;
varajohtai+N:vara#johta N_OSTAI  "varajohtaja" ;
vardoiččijat+N:vardoičči N_PEZII-PL  "vartiosto" ;
veziböbökky+N:vezi#böbökkä N_MEČČY  "vesikovakuoriainen" ;
voije+N:voide N_LATE  "voide" ;
vägivaldu+N:vägi#valda N_AKKU-SG  "väkivalta" ;
väzyndy+N:väzyndä N_PÄIVY-SG  "väsyminen" ;
černilat+N:černila N_MUARJU-PL  "muste" ;
čondžoi+N:čondžoi N_REBOI  "kirppu" ;
šlötty+N:šlöttä N_KOIRU-SG  "räntä" ;
